Louisiana, session 2026, HB180.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2717.1.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2717.1.1. Expropriation; private entity; foreign adversary; agent of a foreign
adversary
For the purposes of expropriation of property by a private entity:
(1) "Foreign adversary" means an individual or a government identified as
a foreign adversary in 15 CFR 7.4(a) and identified in the database maintained by the
United States Department of the Treasury, office of foreign assets control.
(2) "Agent of a foreign adversary" means the juridical person, as defined in
Civil Code Article 24, in which the foreign adversary has the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management or policies of the juridical person whether
through ownership of securities, by contract, or otherwise. A person or entity that
directly or indirectly has the right to vote fifty percent or more of the voting interests
of an entity or is entitled to fifty percent or more of its profits is presumed to have
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 180 ENROLLED
the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of the
juridical person.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.